South Dakota, session 2026, SB128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 46-1:
A large-use customer, as defined in section 2 of this Act § 49-34A-1, which is
operating as a data center, shall provide notice to and cooperate with each local water
provider to ensure that projected water consumption is compatible with the water supply
in the area in which the customer is located. In addition, the customer:
(1) Must implement closed-loop cooling technology that limits net water withdrawal to
a daily amount, established by the Water Management Board for each source of
water currently used in the state, by rule promulgated pursuant to chapter 1-26;
(2) May not consume an amount of the available water supply in the local service area
exceeding limits established in rule by the board, after allocation to residential and
essential public services; and
(3) In a water shortage, as declared by the Governor or determined by the board,
must reduce water use until all residential and essential public service allocations
are met.
In establishing limits under this section, the board shall seek to ensure water
availability and prevent disproportionate use of water by the customer.
The customer shall submit to the board a quarterly report, in the form and manner
prescribed by the board, of the customer's water use. The report must contain average
usage data and certification of compliance with this section. The board shall make the
usage data contained in the report available to the public.
For purposes of this section, "closed-loop cooling technology" means a sealed
system that continuously cycles a set volume of liquid through a closed circuit in which
the liquid, after absorbing heat, is chilled and recirculated.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

128B 2 128
For purposes of this section, "data center" means a centralized repository for the
dissemination, management, processing, and storage of electronic data and information.
Section 2. That § 49-1A-3 be AMENDED:
49-1A-3. There is hereby levied on each public utility, as defined in subdivision
49-34A-1(12) § 49-34A-1, which is subject to the rate regulation of the commission, and
all each telecommunications companies company, as defined in subdivision 49-31-1(26)
§ 49-31-1, a tax of not more than .0015 or two hundred fifty dollars, whichever is greater,
upon the annual intrastate gross receipts derived by the public utility or
telecommunications company from its customers within the State of South Dakota this
state during the preceding calendar year. The two hundred fifty dollar minimum gross
receipt tax does not apply to telecommunications companies providing local exchange
service, as defined in subdivision 49-31-1(13) § 49-31-1, or to radio common carriers.
Section 3. That § 49-34A-1 be AMENDED:
49-34A-1. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Assigned service area," the geographical area in which the boundaries are
established as provided in §§ 49-34A-42 to 49-34A-44, inclusive, and 49-34A-48
to 49-34A-59, inclusive;
(2) "Commission," the South Dakota Public Utilities Commission of the State of South
Dakota;
(3) "Customer," any person contracting for or purchasing gas or electric service from
a utility;
(4) "Depreciated original cost," the cost of property to the person first devoting it to
public service, less the depreciation reserve, which includes accumulated
depreciation charges calculated on a straight-line method and based upon the
estimated service life of the property, together with other items normally
accounted for in the depreciation reserve, and but does not include any good will
or, going concern value, nor does it include or certificate value in excess of
payments made or costs incurred in the initial acquisition thereof;
(5) "Electric line," any line for conducting electric energy at a design voltage of twenty-
five thousand volts phase to phase or less and used for distributing electric energy
directly to customers;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

128B 3 128
(6) "Electric service," electric service furnished to a customer for ultimate
consumption, but not including wholesale electric service furnished by an electric
utility to another electric utility for resale;
(7) "Electric utility," any person operating, maintaining, or controlling, maintaining, or
operating, in this state, equipment or facilities for providing electric service to or
for the public, including facilities owned by a municipality;
(8) "Gas service," retail sale of natural gas or manufactured gas distributed through a
pipeline to fifty or more customers or the sale of transportation services by an
intrastate natural gas pipeline;
(9) "Gas utility," any person operating, maintaining, or controlling, maintaining, or
operating, in this state, equipment or facilities for providing gas service to or for
the public;
(9A)(10) "Incremental costs," all costs incurred by a public an electric utility, which are
directly attributable to a large-use customer and incurred in addition to the normal
costs of providing service to other existing customers;
(11) "Intrastate natural gas pipeline," any natural gas pipeline located entirely within
the state that, which transports gas from a receipt point to one or more locations
for customers other than the pipeline operator. However, provided that the term
does not apply if:
(a) If there is only one customer and the customer is a wholly-owned wholly
owned subsidiary of the pipeline operator,;
(b) If the customer is the parent company of the pipeline operator, or;
(c) If the customer and the pipeline operator are wholly-owned wholly owned
subsidiaries of the same parent company. Further, the term does not apply
to; or
(d) To natural gas lines and appurtenant facilities used to gather gas from
natural gas production facilities or sites and move the gas to an
interconnecting transportation pipeline system;
(10)(12) "Large-use customer," a customer, established after July 1, 2026, which
requires electric service with a contracted demand of two thousand kilowatts or
more has an anticipated peak electrical demand of ten megawatts or greater;
(13) "Municipality," any incorporated town or city in South Dakota this state;
(11)(14) "Person," a natural person, a partnership, a private corporation, a public
corporation, a limited liability company, a municipality, an association, a
cooperative whether incorporated or not, a joint stock association, a business trust,
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

128B 4 128
any of the federal, state and local governments, including any of their political
subdivisions, agencies and instrumentalities, an association; business trust;
cooperative, whether or not incorporated; federal, state, or local government or
any agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision thereof; joint stock
association; limited liability company; natural person; partnership; private or
public corporation; or two or more persons having joint or common interest;
(12)(15) "Public utility," any person operating, maintaining, or controlling, maintaining,
or operating, in this state, equipment or facilities for the purpose of providing gas
or electric service to or for the public, in whole or in part, in this state. However,
provided that the term does not apply to an:
(a) An electric or gas utility owned by a municipality, political subdivision, or
agency of the State of South Dakota this or any other state or a;
(b) A rural electric cooperative as defined in § 47-21-1 for the purposes of
§§ 49-34A-2 to 49-34A-4, inclusive, §§ 49-34A-6 to 49-34A-41, inclusive,
and § 49-34A-62. The term, public utility, does apply to a; or
(c) A rural electric cooperative which that provides gas service;
(13)(16) "Rate," any charge, classification, or compensation, charge and classification,
or any of them demanded, observed, charged, or collected, demanded, imposed,
or observed by any public utility for any service and any rules, regulations,
practices, or contracts contract, practice, regulation, or rule affecting any such
compensation, the charge or, classification, or compensation; and
(14)(17) "Securities," stock and stock certificates or other evidence of interest or
ownership, and bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 49-34A:
Each public utility that provides electric service shall establish a classification of
service, with its own tariff and schedules, for large-use customers, which must be separate
and distinct from classifications of service for other customers.
A tariff established pursuant to this section:
(1) Must allocate incremental costs in a manner that:
(a) Is proportional to each large-use customer's share of the aggregated
incremental costs of all large-use customers served by the utility; and
(b) Does not include the incremental costs of a large-use customer with a
contracted rate established pursuant to section 6 of this Act;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

128B 5 128
(2) May not impose on other customers any rate increase or surcharge that is directly
attributable to the utility usage of a large-use customer; and
(3) Together with related schedules, is subject to commission approval and public
inspection pursuant to § 49-34A-10.
Pursuant to chapter 1-26, the commission shall promulgate rules for determining
incremental costs on a cost-causation basis and may require a large-use customer to
submit periodic reports of the large-use customer's actual and projected utility
consumption, which may be used by the commission to verify the large-use customer's
share of the total incremental costs. The commission may require the large-use customer
to reimburse the commission for the retention of experts and any other costs incurred by
the commission to determine cost impacts and review proposed tariffs pursuant to this
section.
Section 5. That § 49-34A-56 be AMENDED:
49-34A-56. Notwithstanding the establishment of assigned service areas for
electric utilities provided for in §§ 49-34A-43 and 49-34A-44, new customers at new
locations which develop after March 21, 1975, located outside municipalities as the
boundaries thereof existed on March 21, 1975, and who require electric service with a
contracted minimum demand of two thousand kilowatts or more shall not be a new a
large-use customer, or any other new customer requiring electric service with a contracted
minimum demand of two megawatts or more at a new location outside the existing
boundary of a municipality, is not obligated to take electric service from the electric utility
having the assigned service area where the customer is located if, after notice and hearing,
the Public Utilities Commission the commission so determines, after notice, hearing, and
consideration of the following factors:
(1) The electric service requirements of the load to be served;
(2) The availability of an adequate power supply;
(3) The development or improvement of the electric system of the utility seeking to
provide the electric service, including the economic factors relating thereto;
(4) The proximity of adequate facilities from which electric service of the type required
may be delivered;
(5) The preference of the large-use customer; and
(6) Any and all pertinent factors affecting the ability of the utility to furnish adequate
electric service to fulfill customers' the requirements of all customers.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

128B 6 128
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 49-34A:
Notwithstanding the requirements of section 4 of this Act, any large-use customer
may negotiate with an electric utility provider a rate for electric service and enter into a
written contract that:
(1) Specifies the duration of the contract and the estimated start date of the electric
service;
(2) Obligates the large-use customer to pay a minimum amount or a percentage based
on the large-use customer's projected usage of the electric service that the electric
utility is contracted to provide for the duration of the contract;
(3) Does not shift incremental costs to other customers;
(4) Does not result in any subsidization by other customers; and
(5) Requires the large-use customer to report to the electric utility and to either the
commission and, if the electric utility is a public utility, or the approval authority,
if the electric utility is not a public utility, at least annually, the following
information:
(a) The large-use customer's total electric usage during the reporting period;
and
(b) The large-use customer's projected electric usage for twelve consecutive
months following the reporting period.
Any report submitted pursuant to this section is available for public inspection,
except that the large-use customer's proprietary information and trade secrets, as defined
in § 1-27-28, and other sensitive information or data, as described in § 1-27-1.6, are
confidential.
A contracted rate established negotiated between a large-use customer and a
public utility pursuant to this section does not violate § 49-34A-3 if, after consideration of
the factors in § 49-34A-56, the commission approves the contract and determines the
contract is in the public interest.
If the electric utility serving the large-use customer is a public utility, the
commission may require the large-use customer to reimburse the commission for the
retention of experts and any other costs incurred by the commission to process and review
contracts, rates, and reports pursuant to this section.
If the electric utility serving the large-use customer is not a public utility, the
applicable approval authority may require the large-use customer to pay for costs
associated with reviewing contracts, rates, and reports pursuant to this section.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

128B 7 128
For purposes of this section, "approval authority" means the board of directors of
a state or rural electric cooperative or the governing body, if the electric utility is owned
by a municipality, political subdivision, or agency of this state.
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 49-34A:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an electric utility may not:
(1) Increase any fee, rate, or surcharge imposed on any customer that is not a large-
use customer, for the purpose of financing, offsetting, or subsidizing the
infrastructure costs, service demands, or utility consumption of a large-use
customer; or
(2) Allocate to any customer that is not a large-use customer incremental costs or any
other cost associated with the distribution, generation, or transmission
infrastructure of a large-use customer.
Section 8. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 49-34A:
If an electric utility a transmission operator declares an energy shortage or
forecasts that peak demand is projected to exceed supply, each large-use customer of the
utility in the affected service area must curtail electric electricity usage until the electric
utility transmission operator determines the total electricity demand for residential
customers and essential public services is met.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.